Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CAMP FIRE MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Camp Fire Minnesota, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to restore a historic mansion for year-round programming and complete a waterfront erosion and expansion project. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end